Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.090

Tax levy by counties with a population exceeding 2,000,000.

(1) If the hospital is established, the county legislative authority, at the time of levying general taxes, may levy an additional regular property tax, not to exceed 20 cents per thousand dollars of assessed value in any one year, for the operation, maintenance, and capital expenses of the hospital, and any outpatient clinics operated by the hospital, and for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued for such purposes. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the tax levy authorized in this section and the limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first year that the tax levy is imposed under this section.

(2) Only a county with a population exceeding 2,000,000 may impose the additional regular property tax authorized under this section.

[ 2024 c 361 s 2; 1984 c 26 s 6; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 37; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.090. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 174 s 6; RRS s 6090-6.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.